Maryland, session 2026, HB0254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
1–408.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMUNITY PARTICIPATION” INCLUDES:
(1) FACILITATING, HOSTING, OR ATTENDING COMMUNITY MEETINGS;
(2) PROVIDING COMMUNITY PERSPECTIVES THROUGHOUT PROJECT
PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT; AND
(3) SERVING AS A DEDICATED PROJECT PARTNER OR COMMUNITY
LIAISON.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL FACILITATE COMMUNITY PARTICIPATION IN
PROJECT PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT TO ENSURE:
(1) EQUITABLE PARTICIPATION; AND
(2) THAT COMMUNITY PERSPECTIVES, GOALS, AND NEEDS ARE
MEANINGFULLY INFORMING PROJECT DEVELOPMENT.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ENTER INTO CONTRACTUAL
AGREEMENTS WITH OTHER STATE AGENCIES, LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, AND
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS TO PROMOTE AND ENHANCE COMMUNITY
PARTICIPATION IN PROJECT PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT.
(2) A CONTRACTUAL AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 76
(I) MAY ALLOW FOR OTHER STATE AGENCIES, LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS, OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS TO PROVIDE COMPENSATION TO
INDIVIDUALS FOR COMMUNITY PARTICIPATION IN PROJECT PLANNING AND
DEVELOPMENT; AND
(II) SHALL SPECIFY THE TERMS OF ANY GRANT OR PAYMENT TO
BE RECEIVED.
SUBTITLE 12. RESILIENCE THROUGH RESTORATION CAPITAL GRANT FUND.
3–1201.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “FUND” MEANS THE RESILIENCE THROUGH
RESTORATION CAPITAL GRANT FUND.
3–1202.
(A) THERE IS A RESILIENCE THROUGH RESTORATION CAPITAL GRANT
FUND IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE EQUITABLE GRANT
FUNDING TO STATE AGENCIES, LOCAL JURISDICTIONS, AND NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS FOR THE PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND ADAPTIVE
MANAGEMENT OF NATURE–BASED RESTORATION PROJECTS THAT REDUCE THE
STATE’S CLIMATE CHANGE VULNERABILITIES AND ENHANCE THE RESILIENCE OF
THE STATE’S COMMUNITIES AND PUBLIC LANDS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) MONEY FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES, INCLUDING FROM
FEDERAL SOURCES, ACCEPTED FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND;
– 3 –

Ch. 76 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR:
(1) PROVIDING GRANTS TO STATE AGENCIES, LOCAL GOVERNMENTS,
AND NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS IN THE STATE FOR THE PLANNING, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND ADAPTIVE MANAGEMENT OF NATURE–BASED RESTORATION
PROJECTS THAT REDUCE THE STATE’S CLIMATE CHANGE VULNERABILITIES AND
ENHANCE THE RESILIENCE OF THE STATE’S COMMUNITIES AND PUBLIC LANDS;
(2) SUPPORTING PROGRAMMATIC AND PROJECT–LEVEL ADAPTIVE
MANAGEMENT THAT REDUCES THE STATE’S OVERALL CLIMATE CHANGE
VULNERABILITIES AND ENHANCES THE RESILIENCE OF THE STATE’S COMMUNITIES
AND PUBLIC LANDS; AND
(3) ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 1–103(B)(2) OF THIS ARTICLE.
(G) A PROJECT THAT RECEIVES FUNDING UNDER THE FUND:
(1) SHALL ENHANCE THE ABILITY OF COMMUNITIES AND PUBLIC
LANDS TO PREPARE FOR, RESPOND TO, OR RECOVER FROM EXTREME HAZARDS
SUCH AS STORMS AND MORE FREQUENT AND INTENSE RAIN EVENTS OR CHRONIC
HAZARDS SUCH AS NUISANCE FLOODING AND SEA LEVEL RISE;
(2) SHALL USE AT LEAST 3% OF THE FUNDING FOR PROGRAMMATIC
OR PROJECT–LEVEL ADAPTIVE MANAGEMENT; AND
(3) MAY INCLUDE:
(I) NATURAL AND NATURE–BASED SHORELINE RESTORATION;
(II) FLOODPLAIN RESTORATION;
(III) BENEFICIAL USE OF DREDGED MATERIAL;
(IV) TIDAL AND NONTIDAL WETLAND RESTORATION;
(V) DUNE AND BEACH RESTORATION;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 76
(VI) GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER NATURE–BASED PROJECT THAT PROVIDES
COMMUNITY AND ECOSYSTEM BENEFITS BY RESTORING, ENHANCING, OR CREATING
HABITAT.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
SUBTITLE 13. INCREASING CLIMATE CHANGE RESILIENCE OF LOCAL
JURISDICTIONS.
3–1301.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “PLANNING TOOLS AND RESOURCES” MEANS ANY MAPPING
APPLICATION, DATASET, ANALYTICAL MODEL, ASSESSMENT METHODOLOGY,
TECHNICAL RESOURCE, OR OTHER TOOL DEVELOPED OR MAINTAINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT THAT REFLECTS THE LATEST CLIMATE AND ENVIRONMENTAL
SCIENCE AND PROVIDES INFORMATION RELEVANT TO CLIMATE CHANGE AND
NATURAL RESOURCE PLANNING.
3–1302.
(A) BY OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP:
(1) A USER–FRIENDLY WEBSITE THAT SERVES AS THE CENTRAL
ACCESS POINT FOR THE DEPARTMENT’S PLANNING TOOLS AND RESOURCES;
(2) STREAMLINED GUIDANCE TO SUPPORT THE USE AND
INTEGRATION OF THE DEPARTMENT’S PLANNING TOOLS AND RESOURCES INTO
LOCAL JURISDICTION PLANNING EFFORTS; AND
(3) TRAINING TO ASSIST LOCAL JURISDICTIONS IN INCORPORATING
CLIMATE ADAPTATION PLANNING INTO LOCAL COMPREHENSIVE PLANS AND OTHER
PLANNING DOCUMENTS.
– 5 –

Ch. 76 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN AND REGULARLY UPDATE THE
WEBSITE, GUIDANCE, AND TRAININGS DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION WITH BEST–AVAILABLE DATA AND INFORMATION.
SUBTITLE 22. INCREASING CLIMATE CHANGE RESILIENCE ON DEPARTMENT
LANDS.
5–2201.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “DEPARTMENT LANDS” MEANS ALL LANDS OWNED,
LEASED, OR MANAGED BY THE DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING STATE PARKS, WILDLIFE
MANAGEMENT AREAS, NATURAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT AREAS, AND STATE
FORESTS.
5–2202.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY CLIMATE VULNERABILITIES AND RISKS ON
DEPARTMENT LANDS;
(2) EVALUATE OPPORTUNITIES TO IMPLEMENT CLIMATE CHANGE
MITIGATION, ADAPTATION, OR RESILIENCE PROJECTS, INCLUDING NATURE–BASED
SOLUTIONS AND ADAPTIVE MANAGEMENT, ON DEPARTMENT LANDS; AND
(3) PRIORITIZE DEPARTMENT LANDS FOR PROJECTS BASED ON
CLIMATE RISK, ECOLOGICAL VALUE, AND POTENTIAL CO–BENEFITS.
(B) BY DECEMBER 31, 2035, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR TWO COASTAL AND TWO
INLAND PROPERTIES OWNED, LEASED, OR MANAGED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
8–1005.
(a) (1) There is a “Shore Erosion Control Construction Loan Fund”.
(2) The Department shall administer the Fund to provide interest–free
loans or grants to persons, municipalities, or counties for design and construction of shore
erosion control projects.
(3) The Fund shall be maintained by:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 76
(i) Repayments of principal on loans made from the Fund, with the
repayments made through a benefit charge the State levies on privately owned property
benefited by shore erosion control projects. The benefit charge shall compensate the State
for net project construction cost. The benefit charge shall be levied at a uniform rate over a
period not exceeding 25 years;
(ii) Repayment of administrative costs under § 8–1004 of this
subtitle; and
(iii) Annual appropriation of funds to restore the Fund to a level
sufficient to carry out an effective shore erosion control construction loan program during
the succeeding year.
[(2)] (4) (i) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject
to § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) Any [investment] INTEREST earnings of the Fund shall be
credited to the [General] Fund [of the State].
[(3)] (5) (I) A property owner whose project is approved is eligible to
receive an interest–free loan [covering 100% of the first $60,000 of project construction cost,
50% of the next $20,000 of project construction cost, 25% of the next $20,000 of project
construction cost, and 10% of the part of construction cost exceeding $100,000. However,
where].
(II) IF 2 or more property owners are included within a shore erosion
control project, the land of each property owner [is] SHALL BE considered a separate shore
erosion project for the purpose of computing net project construction cost [under this
formula].
(III) SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDING, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY, AT THE DEPARTMENT’S DISCRETION, AUTHORIZE PARTIAL
FORGIVENESS OF A LOAN GRANTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
ECOLOGICALLY BASED, PERFORMANCE–BASED, AND EQUITY–BASED CRITERIA
DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or by regulation of the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall credit to the General Fund any interest on or other income
from State money that the Treasurer invests.
(2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
– 7 –

Ch. 76 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund;
214. THE RESILIENCE THROUGH RESTORATION CAPITAL
GRANT FUND; AND
215. THE SHORE EROSION CONTROL CONSTRUCTION
LOAN FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Resilience Through
Restoration Capital Grant Fund established under Section 1 of this Act may not receive
any appropriation from the General Fund of the State in fiscal year 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 8 –